North Dakota, session 69, HB1505.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 12.1-13-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
12.1-13-02. Speculating or wagering on official action or information.
1. A personAn individual is guilty of a class A misdemeanor if during employment as a
public servant, or within one year thereafter, in contemplation of official action by
himselfthe individual as a public servant or by a government agency with which hethe
individual is or has been associated as a public servant, or in reliance on information
to which hethe individual has or had access only in histhe individual's capacity as a
public servant, hethe individual:
a. Acquires a pecuniary interest in any property, transaction, or enterprise which
may be affected by suchthe information or official action;
b. Speculates or wagers on the basis of suchthe information or official action; or
c. Aids another individual to do any of the foregoing.
Page No. 1 25.1244.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
2. A personAn individual is guilty of a class A misdemeanor if as a public servant hethe
individual takes official action which is likely to benefit himthe individual as a result of
an acquisition of a pecuniary interest in any property, transaction, or enterprise, or of a
speculation or wager, which hethe individual made, or caused or aided another to
make, in contemplation of suchthe official action.
3. An individual is immune from prosecution under this section if:
a. The individual was a member of the legislative assembly at the time the official
action was taken;
b. The official action was a vote on a measure in the senate or house of
representatives or a legislative committee; and
c. The individual adhered to section 54 - 66 - 18 requiring an individual to disclose a
potential conflict of interest to the member's respective chamber of the legislative
assembly, legislative committee, the president of the senate, or the speaker of
the house.
SECTION 2. A new section to chapter 54-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Voting on legislation - Immunity - Defense .
If an individual who is a member of the legislative assembly adheres to:
1. Section 54 - 66 - 18 requiring an individual to disclose a potential conflict of interest to
the member's respective chamber of the legislative assembly, a legislative committee,
the president of the senate, or the speaker of the house, the individual and an
"organization" for which the individual is an "agent", as those terms are defined under
section 12.1 - 03 - 04, are immune from criminal prosecution under the laws of this state
for an offense arising from the individual voting on a measure in a legislative
committee, the senate, or the house of representatives.
2. Informal guidance from the executive director of the ethics commission, reliance on
the informal guidance is a defense in a prosecution for an offense arising from the
individual voting on a measure in a legislative committee, the senate, or the house of
representatives, if:
a. The individual acts in good faith; and
Page No. 2 25.1244.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
b. The material facts surrounding the conduct are substantially the same as the
conduct presented in the informal guidance.
3. Written guidance from the executive director of the ethics commission issued under
the rules of the ethics commission, reliance on the written guidance is a defense in a
prosecution for an offense arising from the individual voting on a measure in a
legislative committee, the senate, or the house of representatives.
SECTION 3. A new section to chapter 54-66 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Issuance of alleged violation - Closure of the matter.
Upon completion of an informal investigation, the executive director shall prepare a report
and recommendation to the commission to close the matter or issue an alleged violation. The
commission may issue an alleged violation, require additional informal investigation, or close
the matte r . At any time during the enforcement action, the commission may settle and close the
matter. A settlement may include the issuance of an advisory opinion pursuant to section
54 - 66 - 04.2 or informal guidance pursuant to the rules of the commission .
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Section 54-66-10 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
54-66-10. Appeals.
An accused individual may appeal a finding of the ethics commission order to the district
court of the county where the accused individual resides, the district court in Burleigh County, or
a district court of the county in which a substantial part of the subject matter of the alleged
violation occurred within thirty days after notice of the commission order.
SECTION 5. AMENDMENT. Section 54-66-12 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
54-66-12. Confidential information.
1. The following information is a confidential record as defined in section 44-04-17.1,
unless the commission has determined the accused individual violated article XIV of
the Constitution of North Dakota, this chapter, or another law or rule regarding
transparency, corruption, elections, or lobbying,issued a final commission order and a
court affirmed the determination final commission order , if appealed, except the
Page No. 3 25.1244.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
information may be disclosed as required by law or as necessary to conduct an
investigation arising from a complaintduring an enforcement action:
a. InformationRelevant information submitted to the commission by an individual;
b. Information prepared for the commission to determine whether to issue an
alleged violation;
c. Information revealing the contents of a complaintan alleged violation;
b. Information
d. Information that reasonably may be used to identify an accused individuala
respondent; and
c. Information
e. Information relating to or created as part of an investigation of a complaintan
alleged violation.
2. If a complaint is informally resolved under section 54-66-07, the following information
is a confidential record as defined in section 44-04-17.1:
a. Information revealing the contents of the complaint;
b. Information that reasonably may be used to identify the accused individual;
c. Information relating to or created as part of the process leading to the informal
resolution; and
d. Information revealing the informal resolution.
3. Information that reasonably may be used to identify the complainantan individual who
provides relevant information to the commission is confidential unless the
complainantindividual waives confidentiality, authorizes its disclosure, or divulges
information that reasonably would identify the complainantindividual. Information,
including evidence under consideration by the investigator or commission, deemed
confidential under this subsection may be disclosed as required by law or as
necessary to conduct an investigation arising from a complaint to include disclosure of
evidence being considered to an accused individuala respondent.
4.3. The information deemed confidential in subsections 1 and 2 subsection 1 may be
disclosed by the ethicsindividual who provides relevant information to the commission,
the respondent, and the commission if the accused individualrespondent agrees to the
disclosure.
Page No. 4 25.1244.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
4. The commission may disclose the information deemed confidential in subsection 1 to
an entity with appropriate enforcement authority.
5. A record created or maintained by a public entity, other than the commission, retains
its status as an open, closed, exempt, or confidential record as defined in section
44 - 04 - 17.1, notwithstanding the disclosure of the record to the ethics commission
during an enforcement action or the relevance of the record to an enforcement action.
SECTION 6. AMENDMENT. Section 54-66-18 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
54-66-18. Conflicts of interest - Legislative assembly.
1. Each legislative assembly shall adopt conflict of interest rules. The rules must:
a. Require the disclosure by a member of a potential conflict of interest relating to
any bill in which the member may have a direct, unique, substantial, or and
individual interest.
b. Ensure a mechanism is in place to record each disclosure and make it readily
available to the public.
2. If the legislative assembly adopts rules under subsection 1 which are at least as
restrictive as the conflict of interest rules adopted by the ethics commission, the
disclosure process portion of the conflict of interest rules adopted by the ethics
commission may not apply to members of the legislative assembly.
SECTION 7. APPLICATION. This Act applies to actions occurring on or after the effective
date of this Act.
SECTION 8. EMERGENCY. This Act is declared to be an emergency measure.
Page No. 5 25.1244.02000